Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1598.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of education; community gardens The sum of $500,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of education to award grants pursuant to title 41, chapter 24, Arizona Revised Statutes, to school districts and charter schools to build community gardens.